District of Columbia statutes.
16-1333

Notice of sale of excess property.

When excess real property is to be sold pursuant to section 16-1332 , notice of not less than twenty days before the sale shall be published in a daily newspaper published in the District of Columbia, and notice shall be sent before the sale, by registered mail or by certified mail, to the last-known address of the persons listed on the records of the assessor of the District as the owners of the property abutting on the property to be sold.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 576, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
1981 Ed., § 16-1333.
1973 Ed., § 16-1333.